Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.040

Gambling commission—Members—Appointment—Vacancies, filling.

There shall be a commission, known as the "Washington state gambling commission", consisting of five members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. The members of the commission shall be appointed within thirty days of July 16, 1973 for terms beginning July 1, 1973, and expiring as follows: One member of the commission for a term expiring July 1, 1975; one member of the commission for a term expiring July 1, 1976; one member of the commission for a term expiring July 1, 1977; one member of the commission for a term expiring July 1, 1978; and one member of the commission for a term expiring July 1, 1979; each as the governor so determines. Their successors, all of whom shall be citizen members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, upon being appointed and qualified, shall serve six year terms: PROVIDED, That no member of the commission who has served a full six year term shall be eligible for reappointment. In case of a vacancy, it shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion of the term in which said vacancy occurs. No vacancy in the membership of the commission shall impair the right of the remaining member or members to act, except as in RCW 9.46.050(2) provided.

In addition to the members of the commission there shall be four ex officio members without vote from the legislature consisting of: (1) Two members of the senate, one from the majority political party and one from the minority political party, both to be appointed by the president of the senate; (2) two members of the house of representatives, one from the majority political party and one from the minority political party, both to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; such appointments shall be for the term of two years or for the period in which the appointee serves as a legislator, whichever expires first; members may be reappointed; vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments are made. Such ex officio members who shall collect data deemed essential to future legislative proposals and exchange information with the board shall be deemed engaged in legislative business while in attendance upon the business of the board and shall be limited to such allowances therefor as otherwise provided in RCW 44.04.120, the same to be paid from the "gambling revolving fund" as being expenses relative to commission business.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 12; 1974 ex.s. c 135 s 12; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 155: See note following RCW 9.46.010.